Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 8 Decorations

30-8-1.
National guard service medal.

In recognition of honorable service in the Rhode Island national guard, the Rhode Island national guard service medal will be awarded to every commissioned officer, warrant officer, and enlisted person now, or hereafter, in the Rhode Island national guard, who has rendered seven (7) years continuous honorable service in the Rhode Island national guard; each commissioned officer, warrant officer, and enlisted person who shall have rendered honorable service in the Rhode Island national guard for a period of ten (10) years, at least seven (7) of which shall have been continuous, and for each additional five (5) years of honorable service, whether continuous or not, shall receive appropriate clasps to be worn on the ribbon of the medal; provided, that officers or enlisted persons of the Rhode Island national guard who were in federal service during World War I, World War II, or the Korean Emergency shall be given credit for this service as state service and those who were commissioned, warranted, or enlisted in the Rhode Island national guard upon its reorganization or within six (6) months from the time of discharge from federal service shall be entitled to have the intervening period counted as state service for the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 231; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 65, § 1.

30-8-2.
Bronze service medal.

In recognition of honorable service in the militia of Rhode Island other than in the national guard, every commissioned officer, warrant officer, and enlisted person, now or hereafter in the militia of this state, who has rendered seven (7) years continuous honorable service, and any officer or enlisted person hereafter completing a like service, shall receive, upon application to the adjutant general, a bronze service medal; and for ten (10) years of honorable service, at least seven (7) of which shall have been continuous, and for each additional five (5) years of honorable service, whether continuous or not, the officer or enlisted person shall receive appropriate clasps to be worn on the ribbon of the medal; provided, that, officers and enlisted persons of the militia who were in federal service during World War I, World War II, and the Korean Emergency shall be given credit for this service as state service and those who were commissioned, warranted, or enlisted in the militia upon its reorganization or within six (6) months from the time of discharge from federal service shall be entitled to have the intervening period counted as state service for the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 230; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 83, § 1.

30-8-3.
Rhode Island cross.

The Rhode Island cross may be awarded, in the name of the governor, to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the armed forces of the United States, including the reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island national guard, while on active state or federal service, distinguishes himself or herself conspicuously by extraordinary heroism. No more than one Rhode Island cross shall be awarded to any one person, but for each succeeding deed or act sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island cross, a bronze oak leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 232; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-3

.

30-8-4.
Rhode Island star.

The Rhode Island star may be awarded, in the name of the governor, to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the armed forces of the United States, including the reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island national guard, while on active state or federal service, distinguishes himself or herself conspicuously by exceptionally meritorious service to the state or federal government in a duty of responsibility. No more than one Rhode Island star shall be awarded to any one person, but for each succeeding service, sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island star, a bronze oak leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 233; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-4

.

30-8-5.
Marksmanship and attendance badges.

The adjutant general may issue appropriate badges or insignia for excellence in marksmanship, drill attendance, and other meritorious service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 234; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-5

, P.L. 1988, ch. 188, § 1.

30-8-6.
Design of decorations.

The adjutant general shall approve the quality and design of, and shall provide and procure appropriate emblematic devices for, each decoration, together with suitable ribbons and insignia to be worn therewith or in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 235; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-6

.

30-8-7.
Rules, regulations, and orders.

The adjutant general shall make from time to time, rules, regulations, and orders, not inconsistent herewith, that he or she deems necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter; to establish awards not inconsistent with this chapter; and to establish the eligibility of persons to receive and the method of award of the decorations provided for under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 236; G.L. 1956, §

30-8-7

; P.L. 1993, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 33.

30-8-8.
Rhode Island national guard emergency service ribbon.

Whenever members of the national guard are ordered into state service pursuant to the provisions of §

30-2-5

or

30-2-6

, then the Rhode Island national guard emergency service ribbon may be awarded for performance over and above the line of duty in the name of the governor, to any person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the Rhode Island national guard, serves honorably during any part of that emergency. No more than one Rhode Island national guard emergency service ribbon shall be awarded to any one person, but for each succeeding service, sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island national guard emergency service ribbon, a bronze oak-leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.

The adjutant general shall follow the provisions of §§

30-8-6

and

30-8-7

with reference to the design and procurement of the ribbon and the rules, regulations, and orders with reference thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 212, § 1.

30-8-9.
Rhode Island defense service medal.

Members of the national guard ordered, called, or drafted to active duty under the constitution and laws of the United States during the Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm call-up and all members of the National Guard who were part of the selected Reserve in good standing between August 2, 1990, through November 30, 1995; and from September 11, 2001, to a date to be determined or federal call-ups subsequent thereto, or those serving on full-time national guard training duty during the federal call-up may be awarded the Rhode Island defense service medal. No more than one Rhode Island defense service medal shall be awarded to any person, but for each succeeding service, a bronze oak-leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.

The adjutant general shall follow the provisions of §§

30-8-6

and

30-8-7

with reference to the design and procurement of the medal and the rules, regulations, and orders with reference thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 403, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 33.

30-8-10.
Rhode Island commendation medal.

The Rhode Island commendation medal may be awarded in the name of the governor, to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the armed forces of the United States, including reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island national guard, while on active, state, or federal services, distinguished himself or herself conspicuously by heroism, meritorious achievement, or meritorious service to the state or federal government in a duty of responsibility. The Rhode Island commendation medal may be awarded in the name of the governor to each member of the United States Naval Armed Guard who has received the award of the Asiatic-Pacific campaign medal, the European-African-Middle East campaign medal, or the American campaign medal. No more than one Rhode Island commendation medal shall be awarded to any one person, but for each succeeding service, sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island commendation medal, a bronze oak leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 283, § 1.